Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
304A

UNIVERSITY OF HAWAII SYSTEM

Part I. System Structure

Section

A. General and Administrative Provisions

304A-101 Establishment; available to all

304A-102 Purposes of the university

304A-103 University to be public corporation; general
powers

304A-104 Regents; appointment; tenure;
qualifications;

meetings

304A-104.5 Repealed

304A-104.6 Candidate advisory council for the board
of regents

of the University of Hawaii

304A-105 Powers of regents; official name

304A-106 Gifts; investment authority

304A-107 Loans; advances

304A-108 Suits

304A-109 Service of process

304A-110 Indemnification

304A-111 Indemnification of collaborating
institutions

304A-112 Contracts for services provided by the
research

corporation of the University of Hawaii

304A-113 Commercial enterprises

304A-114 Hawaii history

304A-115 Depository of war records

304A-116 Child care programs

304A-117 Participation and membership in the
Western

Governors University and other
educational consortia

304A-118 Graduation pathway system

304A-119 University of Hawaii; net-zero energy
goal

304A-120 Campus safety and accountability

B. Agriculture

304A-201 Soil conservation; policy

304A-202 Board to act as agency

304A-203 Powers and duties of agency

304A-204 Specialist in cooperative organizations

304A-205 Agriculture, forestry, and natural
resource

management program, University
of Hawaii at Hilo

C. Career and Technical Education Under
Federal Aid

304A-301 State board for career and technical
education;

designation

304A-302 Board's power and authority

304A-303 Career and technical education coordinating
advisory

council

D. Independent Audit Committee

304A-321 Independent audit committee;
established;

powers; duties

Part II. Students

A. Tuition and Fees

304A-401 Tuition fees; resident, nonresident;
other fees

304A-402 Residence for tuition purposes; basic
rule

304A-403 Public meetings exemption

B. Scholarship and Assistance Programs

304A-501 University of Hawaii scholarship and
assistance

program; power of regents to grant
scholarship and

assistance

304A-502 Power of regents to grant tuition
waivers

304A-503 Hawaii opportunity program in education

304A-504 Hawaii state scholars program

304A-505 Workforce development scholarship program

C. State Higher Education Loans

304A-601 State higher education loans;
eligibility; amounts

304A-602 Repayment of state higher education
loans;

collection

304A-603 Capacity of minors in qualifying for
state higher

education loans

304A-604 Rules governing state higher education
loan fund

D. Hawaii Educator Loans

304A-701 Hawaii educator loans; eligibility;
amounts;

educator loan forgiveness program;
repayment;

collection

304A-702 Repealed

304A-703 Capacity of minors in qualifying for Hawaii educator

loans

304A-704 Rules governing Hawaii educator loan
program

revolving fund

E. Educational Opportunities

304A-801 Program of equal educational
opportunity;

coordinating office of educational
services for the

disadvantaged

304A-802 College-credit equivalency program
established;

purpose; policies and procedures;
eligibility

304A-803 Dual credit program

F. Continuing Education

304A-901 Tuberculosis clearance certification;
exemption

Part III. University Personnel

A. Positions and Compensation

304A-1001 Exempt personnel

304A-1002 Faculty; classification schedule

304A-1003 Faculty members; exchange privileges;
conditions

304A-1004 Annual report; executive, managerial,
and faculty

salaries

304A-1005 University general counsel

304A-1006 Compensation of education laboratory
school

cafeteria personnel

Part IV. Divisions, Departments, and
Programs

A. Community Colleges

1. General Provisions

304A-1101 System of community colleges; purpose

304A-1102 Powers of board

2. Construction Academy

304A-1141 Purpose

304A-1142 Program; establishment

304A-1143 Administration

304A-1144 Annual report

B. Teacher Education: College

304A-1201 College of education

304A-1202 Teacher education coordinating committee

304A-1203 Repealed

C. Hawaiian Language College

304A-1301 Hawaiian language college; establishment

304A-1302 Functions

D. School of Law

304A-1351 Law school; establishment

304A-1352 Procurement institute; established

E. Nursing and Dental Hygiene: School;
Center

304A-1401 School of nursing and dental hygiene;
establishment

304A-1402 School of nursing and dental hygiene;
functions

304A-1403 Clinical training and practice; board of
regents;

power to contract

304A-1404 Center for nursing; establishment;
advisory board

304A-1405 Advisory board for the center for
nursing; powers

and duties

304A-1406 Center for nursing; functions

304A-1407 Collaboration with the center for
nursing

F. Hawaii Geophysics and Planetology
Institute

304A-1501 Hawaii geophysics and planetology
institute;

director and staff

304A-1502 State geophysicists

304A-1503 Encouragement of federal assistance

G. Environmental Center

304A-1551 Environmental center; structure and
functions

H. Center for Labor Education and
Research

304A-1601 Center for labor education and research;

establishment

304A-1602 Center for labor education and research;
functions

and programs

304A-1603 Labor education advisory council

I. Aquarium and Marine Laboratory

304A-1651 State aquarium

304A-1652 State aquarium; site

304A-1653 State aquarium admission and user fees

J. Medical Education Council

304A-1701 Definitions

304A-1702 Graduate medical education program

304A-1703 Medical education council

304A-1704 Council duties

304A-1705 Council powers

K. Special Medical Residency Program

304A-1751 Findings and purpose

304A-1752 Qualifications for residency program

304A-1753 Contract necessary for filling of
positions

304A-1754 Penalty for breach of contract

304A-1755 Residency program; defined

L. Other Special Medical or Nursing
Programs

304A-1801 Family practice residency program;
established

304A-1802 International exchange program for
health-related

tourism

M. Other Special Programs

304A-1851 Food and beverage; courses of
instruction

304A-1861 Fostering inspiration and relevance
through

science and technology pre-academy
program;

established

304A-1862 Robotics and problem-based, applied
learning

program; established

304A-1863 Research experiences for teachers
program;

Established

304A-1864 `Ulu`ulu: The Henry Ku`ualoha Giugni Moving Image

Archive of Hawai`i

304A-1865 Medical marijuana testing and research programs;

established

N. Hawaii Natural Energy Institute

304A-1891 Hawaii natural energy institute;
structure; function

304A-1892 Advisory council to Hawaii natural
energy institute

304A-1893 Repealed

304A-1893.1 Periodic evaluation

304A-1894 Repealed

304A-1894.1 Plan of action

O. Mauna Kea Lands

304A-1901 Definitions

304A-1902 Mauna Kea lands; fees; lease agreements

304A-1903 Mauna Kea lands; rules

304A-1904 Violations; penalties; costs; collection

304A-1905 Mauna Kea lands; reporting requirements

Part V. Financial Structure

A. Budget Preparation and Administration

304A-2001 Benchmarks; annual budget requests;
biennial reports

304A-2002 Budget request computation; reporting of
exempt fees

of scholarship holders

304A-2003 Appropriations; accounts; depositories

304A-2004 Special and revolving funds;
expenditures in excess

of appropriations

304A-2005 Special and revolving funds; management

304A-2006 Special and revolving funds; fees and
charges;

public meetings exemption

304A-2007 Special and revolving funds; annual
report;

expenditures in excess of appropriations

B. General Funds

304A-2101 General fund budget appropriations;
formulation

C. Special Funds

304A-2151 University of Hawaii risk management
special fund

304A-2152 University of Hawaii at Manoa
malpractice special

fund

304A-2153 University of Hawaii tuition and fees
special fund

304A-2154 Systemwide information technology and
services

special fund

304A-2155 Library special fund

304A-2156 University of Hawaii community services
special fund

304A-2157 University of Hawaii auxiliary
enterprises special

fund

304A-2158 Repealed

304A-2159 University of Hawaii scholarship and
assistance

special fund

304A-2160 State higher education loan fund

304A-2161 Renumbered

304A-2162 Community colleges special fund

304A-2163 Center for nursing special fund

304A-2164 Repealed

304A-2165 State aquarium special fund

304A-2166 University of Hawaii-West Oahu special
fund

304A-2167 Repealed

304A-2167.5 University revenue-undertakings fund

304A-2168 Hawaii cancer research special fund

304A-2169 Repealed

304A-2169.1 Energy systems development special fund

304A-2170 Mauna Kea lands management special fund

304A-2171 John A. Burns school of medicine special
fund

304A-2172 University of Hawaii capital
improvements

program project assessment special fund

304A-2173 Child care programs special fund

304A-2174, 2175 Repealed

304A-2176 University of Hawaii at Manoa
intercollegiate

athletics special fund and University of
Hawaii at

Hilo intercollegiate athletics special fund

304A-2177 Repealed

304A-2178 University of Hawaii-Hilo theatre
special fund

304A-2179 Renumbered

304A-2180 ‘Ulu‘ulu: The Henry Ku‘ualoha Giugni
Moving Image

Archive of Hawai‘i special fund

D. Revolving Funds

304A-2251 University of Hawaii commercial
enterprises

revolving fund

304A-2252 Renumbered

304A-2253 Research and training revolving fund

304A-2254 Renumbered

304A-2255 Student health center revolving fund

304A-2256 Transcript and diploma revolving fund

304A-2257 University of Hawaii student activities
revolving

fund

304A-2258 Repealed

304A-2259, 2261, 2262 Renumbered

304A-2260 University of Hawaii graduate
application revolving

fund

304A-2263 Seed distribution program; revolving
fund

304A-2264 to 2266 Repealed

304A-2267 Center for labor education and research
revolving

fund

304A-2268, 2269 Repealed

fund; University of Hawaii
at Hilo

304A-2270 Hawaiian language college revolving fund

304A-2271 Renumbered

304A-2272 Conference center revolving fund;
University of

Hawaii at Hilo

304A-2273 Community college conference center
revolving fund

304A-2274 University of Hawaii real property and
facilities

use revolving fund

304A-2275 University parking revolving fund

304A-2276 Hawaii educator loan program revolving
fund

304A-2277 Professional student exchange program
revolving

fund

E. Trust Funds

304A-2351 GEAR UP Hawaii scholarship trust fund

304A-2352 University of Hawaii workers'
compensation and

unemployment insurance compensation
trust fund

304A-2353, 2354 Repealed

304A-2355 University of Hawaii quasi-endowment
trust fund

F. Federal Funds

304A-2401 Land-grant college aid

304A-2402 Agricultural extension service;
experiment station

304A-2403 Acceptance of federal aid; career and
technical

education

Part VI. Facilities

A. University Projects--Repealed

304A-2501 to 2518 Repealed

B. University Parking

304A-2601 Parking; control by board of regents

304A-2602 Fines and other penalties

304A-2603 Revenue bonds

C. University Equipment

304A-2651 University of Hawaii equipment

D. University Projects and Purposes

304A-2671 Definitions and interpretations

304A-2672 Powers of the board

304A-2673 Designation and authorization of
university

projects, university systems, networks;

authorization of revenue bonds

304A-2674 Revenue bonds; details, sale, legal
investment

304A-2675 Support facility for variable rate
revenue bonds

304A-2676 CUSIP identification numbers

304A-2677 Covenants in resolution authorizing
revenue bonds

304A-2678 Execution and validity of revenue bonds

304A-2679 Pledge of revenue of the university

304A-2680 Payment and security of revenue bonds;
revenue bonds

not a debt of the State

304A-2681 Imposition of rates, rents, fees, and
charges;

pledge, allocation of appropriation

304A-2682 Revenue bond anticipation notes

304A-2683 University project, university system,
networks, and

revenue bonds exempt from taxation

304A-2684 Powers additional to other powers

304A-2685 Refunding revenue bonds; authorization
and purpose

304A-2686 Fiscal agents

304A-2687 Validation of proceedings

304A-2688 Limitation of authority

304A-2689 Annual report

304A-2690 to 2693 Repealed

Part VII. Administratively Attached
Entities

A. Research Corporation of the University
of Hawaii

304A-3001 Establishment of the research
corporation; purpose

304A-3002 Board of directors; composition

304A-3003 Powers of the research corporation

304A-3004 Research vessel safety requirements

304A-3005 Research corporation excepted from
certain state

laws

304A-3006 Officers and employees of the research
corporation

304A-3007 Annual report

304A-3008 Dissolution

304A-3009 Patents, copyrights, and other rights

304A-3010 Special account

304A-3011 Contracts with state agencies

B. Pacific International Center
for High Technology

Research

304A-3101 Pacific international center for high
technology

research; establishment

C. State Post-Secondary Education
Commission

304A-3151 Establishment of the state
post-secondary education

commission; membership, administration

304A-3152 Commission's powers and authority

304A-3153 Repealed

304A-3154 Cooperation with other state agencies

D. Western Regional Education Compact

304A-3201 Approval of compact

304A-3201.5 Definitions

304A-3201.6 Hawaii western interstate commission for

higher education

304A-3202 Terms and provisions of compact

304A-3203 Execution

304A-3204 State commissioners

304A-3205 Expenditures; reports

304A-3206 Placement of students

304A-3207 Payment of costs

304A-3208 Obligations under compact not impaired

304A-3209 Professional student exchange program;

repayment policy

E. Hawaii Research Center for Futures
Study

304A-3251 Center established

304A-3252 Duties of the center

304A-3253 Director; duties

F. Nursing Scholars Program

304A-3301 Definitions

304A-3302 Nursing scholars program; establishment,

administration

304A-3303 Scholarships; nursing degree programs

304A-3304 Program administration

304A-3305 Annual report

Note

Affirmative consent task force to review University of
Hawaii's executive policy on sexual harassment, sexual assault, etc.; report to
2016-2017 legislature (ceases to exist June 30, 2017). L 2015, c 222.

As appropriate, amendments made to the repealed chapters by L
2006, cc 188, 234, 257, and 316 are incorporated into the corresponding
sections of chapter 304A.

Annual incentive and performance report and plan. L 2008, c
188, §2.

Certain funds administered by the university, abolished. L
2015, c 106, §27.

Charcoal additives, soil nutrient enhancement research, phase
1. L 2007, c 266.

Concussion educational program. L 2012, c 197; L 2016, c 262.

Development of watershed management strategies in at least
two of Hawaii's most severely flood-impacted watersheds. L 2006, c 187.

General fund appropriation reallocation plan, fiscal period
2014-2015 through 2020-2021. L 2013, c 34, §132.

East-West Center:

Extension of Social Security Act to center employees. L
2004, c 176.

Corporation Act. L 1975, c 82; L 1997, c 137; L 1998, c 2,
§110.

Greenhouse gas emissions reduction task force (report to 2010
legislature and every five years thereafter). L 2007, c 234, §§1 to 7.

Hawaii health corps program; incentive program for physicians
and dentists for serving in underserved or rural areas (implementation by
2010). L 2008, c 242.

Health care workforce shortage map and database; projections through
2020. L 2007, c 219, §§5, 6.

Medical marijuana dispensary program in the State;
legislative oversight working group (ceases to exist June 30, 2018); reports to
2017-2018 legislature. L 2016, c 230, §23.

Music and enterprise learning experience (MELE) program
grant. L Sp 2007, c 11, §6.

PBS Hawaii, thirty-five year lease. L Sp 2007, c 11, §3.

Public land trust information system. L 2011, c 54; L 2013,
c 110.

Regents candidate advisory council, existing members to serve
until terms expire. L 2013, c 72, §5.

Science and technology plan incorporating EPSCor
(experimental program to stimulate competitive research) efforts (reports from
2011 and every 5 years thereafter). L 2009, c 137.

Skilled worker and business development center at each
community college. L Sp 2009, c 34.

This chapter is based substantially on repealed chapters 222,
304, 304D, 304E, 305, 305A, 305E, 305H, 306, 307, 308, and 310 and repealed
section 341-5.

Cross References

Bridge to hope program, see §346-68.

College savings program, see chapter 256.

Commission for national and community service, see chapter
90D.

Individual development accounts, see chapter 257.

Professional or vocational licensing sanctions for default on
student loans, see §436B-19.6 and chapter 436C.

Tuition assistance for national guard personnel, see §121-45.

University of Hawaii optional retirement system, see §88-8.

Departmental data sharing (improving educational and
workforce outcomes), see §27-7.

Hawaii agriculture workforce advisory board, see §371-19.

Hawaii health corps, see chapter 309H.

Interstate compact on educational opportunity for military
children, see chapter 311D.

Pacific international space center for exploration systems,
see chapter 201, part V, subpart B.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next